Washington statutes.
RCW 39.94.030

Authority to enter into financing contracts—Terms—Intent—Obligation of state revenues.

(1) The state may enter into financing contracts for itself or on behalf of an other agency for the use and acquisition for public purposes of real and personal property. Payments under financing contracts of the state shall be made by the state from currently appropriated funds or funds not constituting "general state revenues" as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution. Except as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, payments under financing contracts of the state on behalf of any other agency shall be made solely from the sources identified in the financing contract, which may not obligate general state revenues as defined in Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution. The treasurer of an other agency shall remit payments under financing contracts to the office of the state treasurer or to the state treasurer's designee. In the event of any deficiency of payments by an other agency under a financing contract, the treasurer of the other agency shall transfer any legally available funds of the other agency in satisfaction of the other agency's obligations under the financing contract if such funds have been obligated by the other agency under the financing contract and, if such deficiency is not thereby cured, the office of the state treasurer is directed to withdraw from that agency's share of state revenues for distribution or other money an amount sufficient to fulfill the terms and conditions of the financing contract. The term of any financing contract shall not exceed thirty years or the remaining useful life of the property, whichever is shorter. Financing contracts may include other terms and conditions agreed upon by the parties.

(2) The state for itself or on behalf of an other agency may enter into contracts for credit enhancement, which limits the recourse of the provider of credit enhancement solely to the security provided under the financing contract secured by the credit enhancement.

(3) The state or an other agency may grant a security interest in real or personal property acquired under financing contracts. The security interest may be perfected as provided by the uniform commercial code - secured transactions, or otherwise as provided by law for perfecting liens on real estate. Other terms and conditions may be included as agreed upon by the parties. An other agency that is authorized by applicable law to enter into a financing contract may make payments due under such a contract from the proceeds of annual tax levies approved by the voters under RCW 84.52.056, among other sources.

(4)(a) Financing contracts and contracts for credit enhancement entered into under the limitations set forth in this chapter do not constitute a debt or the contracting of indebtedness under any law limiting debt of the state. It is the intent of the legislature that such contracts also do not constitute a debt or the contracting of indebtedness under Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution. Certificates of participation in payments to be made under financing contracts also do not constitute a debt or the contracting of an indebtedness under any law limiting debt of the state if payment is conditioned upon payment by the state under the financing contract with respect to which the same relates. It is the intent of the legislature that such certificates also do not constitute a debt or the contracting of indebtedness under Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution if payment of the certificates is conditioned upon payment by the state under the financing contract with respect to which those certificates relate.

(b) An other agency authorized by law to issue bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness or to enter into conditional sales contracts or lease obligations, may participate in a program under this chapter in which the state enters into a financing contract on behalf of that other agency, and the other agency's obligations to the state under the program may be evidenced by an agreement, lease, bond, note, or other appropriate instrument. A financing contract made by the state on behalf of an other agency may be secured by the pledge of revenues of the other agency or other agency's full faith and credit or may, at the option of the state finance committee, include a contingent obligation by the state for payment under such financing contract.

[ 2010 c 115 s 2; 2009 c 500 s 7; 1998 c 291 s 4; 1989 c 356 s 3.]

NOTES:

Authority—2010 c 115: "The authority conferred on the state and any municipal corporation or other agency under this act is in addition and supplemental to any other authority granted by applicable law. Any action previously taken by the state, a municipal corporation, or other agency consistent with the provisions of this act is approved and confirmed." [ 2010 c 115 s 4.]

Effective date—2009 c 500: See note following RCW 39.42.070.

Application—1998 c 291: See note following RCW 39.94.050.